Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-106.01
Clerk of the district court; costs; record.

The clerk of the district court shall keep a record of the costs chargeable and taxable against each party in any suit pending in court. He or she at any time may make out a statement of such fees specifying each item of the fees so charged and taxed under seal of the court, which fee bill, so made under the seal of the court, shall have the same force and effect as an execution. The sheriff to whom the fee bill shall be issued shall execute the same as an execution and have the same fees therefor. The clerk shall not enter on the record any fees of any officer claiming the same, unless such officer shall duly return an itemized bill of the same.

R.S.1866, c. 19, § 3, p. 157;

Laws 1877, § 4, p. 217;

Laws 1899, c. 31, § 1, p. 164;

Laws 1905, c. 68, § 1, p. 363;

Laws 1909, c. 55, § 1, p. 280;

R.S.1913, §§ 2421, 2429;

Laws 1917, c. 40, § 1, p. 119;

Laws 1919, c. 82, § 1, p. 204;

C.S.1922, §§ 2362, 2369;

Laws 1925, c. 81, § 1, p. 255;

Laws 1927, c. 118, § 1, p. 328;

C.S.1929, §§ 33-101, 33-108;

R.S.1943, § 33-106;

Laws 1947, c. 120, § 1, p. 353;

Laws 1949, c. 94, § 1(2), p. 253;

Laws 1959, c. 140, § 5, p. 547;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 71.